apertium-ga-gd/apertium-ga-gd.ga-full.dix
    <pardef n="pí/b__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>b</l>
          <r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>be</l>
          <r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oba</l>
          <r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ob</l>
          <r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Aontro/im__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>im<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r>im<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="píb"><par n="initial-p"/><i>í</i><par n="pí/b__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Aontroim"><i>Aontro</i><par n="Aontro/im__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Liatroim"><i>Liatro</i><par n="Aontro/im__n"/></e>
